src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives_v

@P.Stem.Nom@aasiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘aasʲiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
abistav+A:abistav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
ahastav+A:ahastav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
ahenev+A:ahenev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
ahistav+A:ahistav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
ahvatlev+A:ahvatlev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
aimatav+A:aimatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@aimav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘aimav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@aitav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘aitav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ajav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@ajav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
alandav+A:alandav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
alarmeeriv+A:alarm˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@algav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘algav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
alistuv+A:alistuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@alluv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘alluv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
alustav+A:alustav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
ammendav+A:ammendav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
analüüsiv+A:anal˘üüsiv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
andestatav+A:andestatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@antav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘antav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
arendav+A:arendav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
arenev+A:arenev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@arglev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘arglev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
armastav+A:armastav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
arvatav+A:arvatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@arvav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘arvav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
arvestatav+A:arvestatav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
arvestav+A:arvestav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
arvustav+A:arvustav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
asetsev+A:asetsev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
astendatav+A:astendatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@astuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘astuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@asuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@asuv MAGUS  "weight: 6 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@aurav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘aurav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@austav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘austav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
avanev+A:avanev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
avastatav+A:avastatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
avatav+A:avatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
baseeruv+A:bas˘eeruv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
dissoneeruv+A:disson˘eeruv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
domineeriv+A:domin˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
ebalev+A:ebalev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
edenev+A:edenev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@edev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@edev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
edvistav+A:edvistav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
eeldatav+A:˘eeldatav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
eelistatav+A:eelistatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
eelistav+A:eelistav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eelnev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘eelnev MAGUS  "weight: 6 " ; 
eemalduv+A:eemalduv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
ehitatav+A:ehitatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
ehitav+A:ehitav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
ehmatav+A:ehmatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ehtiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘ehtiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eirav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘eirav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eitav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘eitav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
eksamineeritav+A:eksamineeritav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
eksisteeriv+A:eksist˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
eksitav+A:eksitav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@eksiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘eksiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ekslev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘ekslev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
eksperimenteeriv+A:eksperiment˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@elav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@elav MAGUS  "weight: 6 " ; 
elev+A:elev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
elustav+A:elustav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
ennetav+A:ennetav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
ennustav+A:ennustav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
eputav+A:eputav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
eraldatav+A:eraldatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
eraldav+A:eraldav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
eralduv+A:eralduv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
erastatav+A:erastatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@erev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@erev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
erinev+A:erinev MAGUS  "weight: 4 " ; 
eristav+A:eristav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
eritlev+A:eritlev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
erutav+A:erutav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
esindav+A:esindav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
esinev+A:esinev MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
esitatav+A:esitatav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
fraasitsev+A:fraasʲitsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
funktsioneeriv+A:funktsion˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
garanteeriv+A:garant˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@haarav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘aarav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
haavatav+A:haavatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
haigutav+A:haigutav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@haihtuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘aihtuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@haisev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘aisev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hajuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@hajuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
hakatav+A:hakatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hakkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘akkav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
halastav+A:halastav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@haldav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘aldav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
haletsev+A:haletsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@halvav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘alvav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
halvenev+A:halvenev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
halvustav+A:halvustav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
hammustav+A:hammustav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hariv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@hariv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
harrastav+A:harrastav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@harv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘arv%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@heituv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘eituv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
helendav+A:helendav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
helisev+A:helisev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@helkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘elkav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@helkiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘elʲkiv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@helklev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘elʲklev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
hellitav+A:helʲlitav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
hellitlev+A:helʲlitlev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
higistav+A:higistav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hiilgav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘iilgav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hiiliv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘iiliv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
himustatav+A:himustatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
himustav+A:himustav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
himutsev+A:himutsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hindav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘indav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hingav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘ingav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
hingitsev+A:hingitsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
hinnatav+A:hinnatav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
hirmutav+A:hirmutav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hoiatav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@hoiatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
hooldatav+A:h˘ooldatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hooldav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘ooldav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
hoolitsev+A:hoolʲitsev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hooliv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘oolʲiv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
hoomatav+A:hoomatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hooplev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘ooplev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hoovav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘oovav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
hukutav+A:hukutav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
huligaanitsev+A:huligaanitsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hulkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘ulkuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hurmav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘urmav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
huvitav+A:huvitav MAGUS  "weight: 5 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõljuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘õlʲjuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõlmav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘õlmav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
hõrenev+A:hõrenev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõrgutav+A:hõrgutav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõõguv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘õõguv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
häbenev+A:häbenev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
häbistav+A:häbistav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@häiriv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘äiriv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
hämmastav+A:hämmastav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
hävitav+A:hävitav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hääbuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘ääbuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
hääldatav+A:h˘ääldatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüplev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘üplev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüppav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘üppav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüübiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘üübiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
igatsev+A:igatsev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@igav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@igav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
igavlev+A:igavlev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
ihaldatav+A:ihaldatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
ihaldav+A:ihaldav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
ihalev+A:ihalev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ihkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘ihkav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
